src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-A-nitana_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - nitana - ok : # -m animate noun, my daughter AEW NA1
     nitana+NAD+Px1Sg+Sg: nitana
     nitana+NAD+Px1Sg+Pl: nitaniksi
     nitana+NAD+Px1Sg+Obv: nitani
     nitana+NAD+Px1Sg+Non: nitani
     
     nitana+NAD+Px1Pl+Sg: nitaninnaana
     nitana+NAD+Px1Pl+Pl: nitaninnaaniksi
     nitana+NAD+Px1Pl+Obv: nitaninnaani
     nitana+NAD+Px1Pl+Non: nitaninnaani

     nitana+NAD+Px21Pl+Sg: kitaninnoona
     nitana+NAD+Px21Pl+Pl: kitaninnooniksi
     nitana+NAD+Px21Pl+Obv: kitaninnooni
     nitana+NAD+Px21Pl+Non: kitaninnooni

     nitana+NAD+Px2Sg+Sg: kitana
     nitana+NAD+Px2Sg+Pl: kitaniksi
     nitana+NAD+Px2Sg+Obv: kitani
     nitana+NAD+Px2Sg+Non: kitani

     nitana+NAD+Px2Pl+Sg: kitanoaawa
     nitana+NAD+Px2Pl+Pl: kitanoaawaiksi
     nitana+NAD+Px2Pl+Obv: kitanoaawayi
     nitana+NAD+Px2Pl+Non: kitanoaawai

     nitana+NAD+Px3Sg+Pl: otaniksi
     nitana+NAD+Px3Sg+Obv: otani
     nitana+NAD+Px3Sg+Non: otani

     nitana+NAD+Px3Pl+Pl: otanoaawaiksi
     nitana+NAD+Px3Pl+Obv: otanoaawayi
     nitana+NAD+Px3Pl+Non: otanoaawai

    
